Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.241] CARDIAC EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Cardiac emergency response plan. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, a "cardiac emergency response plan" is a written document that establishes specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest. A cardiac emergency response plan must integrate evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the American Heart Association in accordance with a published, peer-reviewed journal article or similar document. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a school district or charter school must develop a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds or at a school-sponsored activity or event. A district or charter school must consult with athletic trainers when developing the plan. A principal or other person having administrative control over the school site must ensure that the plan is: new text end new text begin (1) available to the school community on the school website and in paper form at various locations at the school site; new text end new text begin (2) distributed to all coaches and other athletic staff members at each school site, all persons responsible for executing the plan in the event of a cardiac emergency, all health care professionals that provide medical services during school-sponsored activities or events, and to other appropriate school staff, as determined by school administrators; and new text end new text begin (3) annually reviewed, rehearsed, and revised, as necessary. new text end new text begin (c) A cardiac emergency response plan must: new text end new text begin (1) identify the members of a cardiac emergency response team at each school site who are on duty during the regular school day; new text end new text begin (2) provide guidelines for the cardiac emergency response team's response to sudden cardiac arrest; new text end new text begin (3) require that automatic external defibrillators are clearly marked and placed in accordance with guidelines from the American Heart Association or other nationally recognized guidelines focused on emergency cardiovascular care. Automatic external defibrillators must be available for use in an unlocked location at each school facility and athletic venue or event. Automatic external defibrillators must be (i) easily accessible at each athletic venue where practices or competitions are held or (ii) located within one to three minutes of each venue where practices or competitions are held; new text end new text begin (4) require training on cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automatic external defibrillator use for coaches, assistant coaches, and other school staff identified by school administrators; new text end new text begin (5) require the emergency response team to participate in a cardiac emergency simulation at least 30 days before the beginning of each school year; new text end new text begin (6) describe the procedures that must be followed after a serious or life-threatening injury or cardiac emergency occurs at an athletic event or activity, including but not limited to responding to the injured individual, summoning emergency medical care, assisting emergency medical service providers, and documenting the actions taken during the emergency; and new text end new text begin (7) encourage cooperation and coordination with community members such as emergency medical technicians and paramedics, among others. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Training requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or charter school must provide all members of a cardiac emergency response team with training necessary to implement a cardiac emergency response plan. new text end new text begin (b) The emergency response team must provide annual certification to the school board that members of the emergency response team completed cardiac emergency simulation training at least 30 days prior to the beginning of each school year. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 128C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3d. new text end new text begin Cardiac emergency response plan. new text end new text begin The league must adopt a cardiac emergency response plan that meets the requirements of section 121A.241. The league must ensure that a cardiac emergency response team is present at each interscholastic athletic activity whose control, supervision, and regulation have been delegated to the Minnesota State High School League in accordance with section 128C.01. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CARDIAC EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN ASSISTANCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cardiac emergency response plan assistance. new text end new text begin (a) To assist school districts and charter schools implementing cardiac emergency response plans under Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.241: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) Funding may be used for activities and equipment that promote cardiac emergency response plan preparedness in schools, including but not limited to the purchase and maintenance of automatic external defibrillators, purchase of cardiopulmonary resuscitation equipment and training for faculty and staff, basic first aid training, and educational materials related to cardiac emergency response preparedness. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end